Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2245.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 HF 2245 (4) 91 je/ns/md H.F. 2245 Section 1. SHORT TITLE. This Act shall be known and may be 1 cited as the âUniversity President Selection Reform Actâ. 2 Sec. 2. Section 262.9, subsection 2, paragraph b, Code 2026, 3 is amended to read as follows: 4 b. (1) When electing a president of an institution of 5 higher learning, the board may shall use a presidential 6 selection committee. Only members of the board shall serve 7 as voting members of a presidential selection committee. The 8 committee shall recommend the most well-qualified candidates 9 considered by the committee to the board. The board shall 10 only elect a president from the recommended candidates. The 11 committee may do any of the following in carrying out its 12 duties: 13 (a) Contract for and use the services of any person engaged 14 in the business of placing highly qualified job candidates in 15 leadership positions. 16 (b) Use moneys allocated to the committee by the board. 17 (2) The identity of a candidate being considered by the 18 committee shall be confidential for purposes of chapter 22 and 19 shall not be subject to public disclosure unless the identity 20 of the candidate is made public by agreement of all voting 21 members of the committee. 22 (3) (a) A presidential selection committee shall consist of 23 five voting members who shall be members of the board. 24 (b) A presidential selection committee shall also consist 25 of the following nonvoting members selected by the board: 26 (i) A student enrolled at the institution. 27 (ii) A member of the faculty senate at the institution. 28 (iii) One other employee of the institution. 29 (iv) One member who is either a graduate of the institution, 30 a member of a nonprofit foundation acting solely for the 31 support of the institution, or a member of the public. 32 -1- HF 2245 (4) 91 je/ns/md 1/ 1